test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_mishoomis_gt-norm.yaml
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisensibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisensibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisensibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisenyibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisenyibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisenyibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisensibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisensibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisensibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensibaniig
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: imishoomisenyibaniing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: imishoomisenyibaniin
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: imishoomisenyibaniig
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: imishoomisensibaniing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: imishoomisensibaniin
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: imishoomisensibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimishoomisimishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21: gimishoomisimishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gimishoomisimishiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv: omishoomisimishini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl: omishoomisimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimishoomisimishiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nimishoomisimishidig, nimishoomisimishidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: gimishoomisimishiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gimishoomisimishidig, gimishoomisimishidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: omishoomisimishiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [omishoomisimishidig, omishoomisimishidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: imishoomisimishiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [imishoomisimishidig, imishoomisimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimishoomisimishing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: nimishoomisimishan
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: nimishoomisimishag
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: gimishoomisimishing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: gimishoomisimishan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: gimishoomisimishag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: omishoomisimishing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: omishoomisimishan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: omishoomisimishag
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: imishoomisimishing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: imishoomisimishan
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: imishoomisimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nimishoomisiminaaniban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nimishoomisiminaanidig, nimishoomisiminaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Pret: gimishoomisiminaaniban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+VocPl: [gimishoomisiminaanidig, gimishoomisiminaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gimishoomisimiwaaban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gimishoomisimiwaadig, gimishoomisimiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret: omishoomisiminiiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [omishoomisiminiidig, omishoomisiminiidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret: omishoomisimiwaaban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [omishoomisimiwaadig, omishoomisimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nimishoomisiminaaning
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nimishoomisiminaanin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nimishoomisiminaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Loc: gimishoomisiminaaning
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Obv: gimishoomisiminaanin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Pl: gimishoomisiminaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gimishoomisimiwaang
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gimishoomisimiwaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gimishoomisimiwaag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Loc: omishoomisiminiing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Obv: omishoomisiminiin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pl: omishoomisiminiig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Loc: omishoomisimiwaang
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Obv: omishoomisimiwaan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pl: omishoomisimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisimibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisimibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisimibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisimibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisimibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisimibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: omishoomisimibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: omishoomisimibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: omishoomisimibaniig
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: imishoomisimibaniing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: imishoomisimibaniin
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: imishoomisimibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimishoomisishinaaniban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimishoomisishinaanidig, nimishoomisishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Pret: gimishoomisishinaaniban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimishoomisishinaanidig, gimishoomisishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimishoomisishiwaaban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimishoomisishiwaadig, gimishoomisishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omishoomisishiniiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omishoomisishiniidig, omishoomisishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omishoomisishiwaaban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omishoomisishiwaadig, omishoomisishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimishoomisishinaaning
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimishoomisishinaanin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimishoomisishinaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Loc: gimishoomisishinaaning
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Obv: gimishoomisishinaanin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Pl: gimishoomisishinaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimishoomisishiwaang
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimishoomisishiwaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimishoomisishiwaag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omishoomisishiniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omishoomisishiniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omishoomisishiniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omishoomisishiwaang
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omishoomisishiwaan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omishoomisishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisishibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisishibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisishibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisishibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisishibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisishibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: omishoomisishibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: omishoomisishibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: omishoomisishibaniig
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: imishoomisishibaniing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: imishoomisishibaniin
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: imishoomisishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisinaanibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisinaanibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisinaanibaniig
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisinaanidig, nimishoomisinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisinaanidig, nimishoomisinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisinaanidig, nimishoomisinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisinaanidig, gimishoomisinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisinaanidig, gimishoomisinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisinaanidig, gimishoomisinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisiwaadig, gimishoomisiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisiwaadig, gimishoomisiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisiwaadig, gimishoomisiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisiniidig, omishoomisiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisiniidig, omishoomisiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisiniidig, omishoomisiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisiwaadig, omishoomisiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisiwaadig, omishoomisiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisiwaadig, omishoomisiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: mishoomisenyishibaniing
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: mishoomisenyishibaniin
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: mishoomisenyishibaniig
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: mishoomisensishibaniing
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: mishoomisensishibaniin
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: mishoomisensishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimishoomisenyimishinaan
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nimishoomisensimishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gimishoomisenyimishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gimishoomisenyimishiwaa
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21: gimishoomisensimishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gimishoomisensimishiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv: omishoomisenyimishini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl: omishoomisenyimishiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv: omishoomisensimishini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl: omishoomisensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimishoomisenyimishiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nimishoomisenyimishidig, nimishoomisenyimishidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nimishoomisensimishiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nimishoomisensimishidig, nimishoomisensimishidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gimishoomisenyimishiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gimishoomisenyimishidig, gimishoomisenyimishidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gimishoomisensimishiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gimishoomisensimishidig, gimishoomisensimishidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: omishoomisenyimishiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [omishoomisenyimishidig, omishoomisenyimishidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: omishoomisensimishiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [omishoomisensimishidig, omishoomisensimishidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: imishoomisenyimishiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [imishoomisenyimishidig, imishoomisenyimishidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: imishoomisensimishiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [imishoomisensimishidig, imishoomisensimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nimishoomisenyimishing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nimishoomisenyimishan
